Tennessee, session 114, SB1925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 50, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
8-50-815.
(a) Special leave is granted to an eligible employee who is a foster parent or
kinship caregiver. The eligible employee may use this leave for when the employee is
required to appear in court or counseling sessions regarding the placement of a foster
child.
(b) Leave used by an eligible employee pursuant to this section must not be
charged to sick, annual, or other leave the employee may have accumulated.
(c) Leave granted pursuant to this section must count toward the eligible
employee's use of leave required to be given by this state as an employer under the
federal Family and Medical Leave Act (29 U.S.C. § 2601, et seq.) and § 4-21-408.
(d) An eligible employee must not be granted more than five (5) workdays of
paid leave under subsection (a) during a twelve-month period.
(e) As used in this section, "eligible employee" means:
(1) An employee who has been employed full-time with the state for at
least twelve (12) consecutive months with an entity described in §§ 8-30-102(a),
8-30-102(b)(2), 8-30-102(b)(6)-(7), and 8-30-102(b)(10)-(13); or
(2) An employee who has been employed full-time with the state for at
least twelve (12) consecutive months with an entity described in § 8-30-
SB1925
010565
- 1 -

102(b)(9), except for an employee of any administrative board or commission
that is attached to an entity described in § 8-30-102(b)(1) or § 8-30-102(b)(3)-(5).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010565